California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
(2) A housing developer or service provider that provides housing or services to female veterans in women-only facilities pursuant to paragraph (1) shall ensure that the housing or services shall provide supportive housing or services with a focus on, among others, treating the effects of military sexual abuse, trauma, or intimidation in a gender-specific manner.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “women-only facilities” means the facilities may house and provide services to female veterans only and their children, and shall not house or provide services to any adult who is not a
 dependent of a female veteran.

(g) In administering the programs established under this article, the departments shall do all of the following:

(1) Make program funds available at the same time funds, if any, are made available under the Multifamily Housing Program (Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 50675) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) Rate and rank applications in a manner consistent with the Multifamily Housing Program (Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 50675) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code), except that the department may establish additional point categories for the purposes of rating and ranking applications that seek funding pursuant to this article in addition to those used in the Multifamily Housing Program.

(3) Administer funds subject to this article in a manner consistent with the Multifamily Housing Program (Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 50675) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code).

(4) Only applications serving veterans and meeting any additional threshold requirements established by the departments, shall be eligible to receive funds pursuant to this article.

(h) In determining whether a potential tenant is eligible for supportive, affordable, or transitional housing under this article, an income eligibility determination shall not take into consideration service-connected disability benefits received by the potential tenant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 150.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

987.006.

(a) No later than August 15, 2014, the departments shall enter into a memorandum of understanding to address their respective and shared responsibilities in implementing, overseeing, and evaluating this article.

(b) No later than August 15, 2014, the departments shall submit the memorandum of understanding to the Senate and Assembly Budget Committees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 3.   (AB 639)   Effective October 10, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

987.007.

The departments shall convene a stakeholder process to inform the development of guidelines for the implementation of any program pursuant to this article. Stakeholders represented shall include, but not be limited to, organizations that have experience providing housing or homeless services, or both, to veterans, housing developers, and public and private agencies that serve the veteran population.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 3.   (AB 639)   Effective October 10, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

987.008.

(a) Pursuant to guidelines or terms developed pursuant to this article, a housing provider or sponsor may redesignate units within a project, so long as the same number of units financed under this act remain restricted to veterans and their families.

(b) Pursuant to guidelines or terms pursuant to this article, any units financed as supportive or transitional housing units for veterans may be
 redesignated as affordable rental or supportive housing to allow a veteran resident to remain housed in the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 3.   (AB 639)   Effective October 10, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

987.009.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the proceeds of bonds deposited in the Housing for Veterans Fund pursuant to Section 998.544 shall be subject to annual appropriation, as determined by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 727, Sec. 3.   (AB 639)   Effective October 10, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

987.010.

(a) For any loans issued pursuant to this article, loan terms shall be consistent with Section 50675.6 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) All moneys received by the department in repayment of loans made pursuant to this article, including interest and payments in advance in lieu of future interest, shall be deposited in the Housing Rehabilitation Loan Fund established by Section 50661 of the Health and Safety Code, and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, are continuously appropriated to the department for the purposes of the Multifamily Housing Program (Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 50675) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code), except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c) The department may designate an amount not to exceed 1.5 percent of funds appropriated for use pursuant to subdivision (b) for the purposes of curing or averting a default on the terms of any loan or other obligation by the recipient of financial assistance, or bidding at any foreclosure sale where the default or foreclosure sale would jeopardize the department’s security in the rental housing development assisted pursuant to this article.  The funds so designated shall be known as the “default reserve.”

(d) The department may use default reserve funds made available pursuant to this section to repair or maintain any rental housing development assisted pursuant to this article that was acquired to protect the department’s security interest.

(e) The payment or advance of funds by the department pursuant to this section
 shall be exclusively within the department’s discretion, and no person shall be deemed to have any entitlement to the payment or advance of those funds.  The amount of any funds expended by the department for the purposes of curing or averting a default shall be added to the loan amount secured by the rental housing development and shall be payable to the department upon demand.

(f) All moneys set aside for the default reserve by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Housing for Veterans Fund established by Section 998.544, and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, are continuously appropriated to the department for the purposes of the default reserve set forth above in this section.

(g) For the purposes of this section, “department” means the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 21) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 192, Sec. 22.   (AB 434)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Section operative January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

987.011.

(a) (1) In the City and County of Los Angeles, where the federal Department of Housing and Urban Development has granted an authority, as defined in Section 34203, a waiver effective August 17, 2024, to allow household income
 verifications to occur after a lease contract is signed for unhoused populations seeking entry into projects pursuant to or in connection with Section 5.110 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, if an owner or a management agent leases a subsidized unit to an unhoused person and subsequently learns
 and verifies that the unhoused person does not meet applicable income requirements, then the department shall not take any negative actions against the owner or management agent if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The owner or management agent has cured the noncompliance within 24 months of discovery of the violation.

(B) The local housing authority and continuum of care have developed and posted on their respective internet websites a plan describing how the local housing authority and continuum of care will coordinate with the owner or management agent to move tenants that do not meet applicable income requirements into affordable housing where the tenant is eligible for occupancy within 24 months of discovery of the violation. Income ineligible tenants shall retain their unhoused targeting eligibility.

(2) For purposes of this
 subdivision, “negative actions” include, but are not limited to, both of the following:

(A) Issuing negative points on a current or future application.

(B) Imposing a financial penalty.

(b) If an agreement between the owner or management agent and the authority or the departments restricts a unit to a tenant earning no more than 30 percent of the area median income, the tenant shall be deemed to satisfy
 the income requirements of this program during the 24-month period described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The tenant experienced homelessness prior to moving into the unit. For purposes of this paragraph, “homelessness” has the same meaning as “homeless,” as that term is defined in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) The tenant self-certified household income at no more than 30 percent of the area median income.

(3) A third-party verification shows that the tenant has household income of no more than 50 percent of the area median income, unless the tenant is otherwise eligible pursuant to federal income eligibility requirements.

(4) The tenant’s income certification is fully verified in accordance with the program rules within 90 days of the date the tenant took possession of the unit.

(5) At least 50 percent of the assisted units restricted to 30 percent area median income are occupied by verified, income-eligible households.

(6) The issuing housing authority and continuum of care, in coordination with other public agencies, coordinate with an owner or a management agent and move a tenant found to have a household income of more than 50 percent of the area median income following third-party verification described in paragraph (3) within 24 months of discovery of the violation to an affordable housing unit for which the tenant is eligible without reliance upon the same waiver described in subdivision (a). Income ineligible tenants shall retain their unhoused targeting eligibility.

(c) (1) This section does not modify any other eligibility requirements attached to assistance provided by the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(2) Tenant self-certified date of birth shall be accepted so long as the agreement
 between the department and the owner does not impose age-based demographic targeting requirements.

(3) If the conditions described in subdivision (b) are met, absent any rent setting methodology from subsidy programs, a tenant whose adjusted income at move-in exceeded 30 percent area median income shall have an effective rent limit for their unit be redesignated to 50 percent of area median income or, if the tenant’s verified income is higher than 50 percent of area median income, an effective rent limit for their unit be redesignated to an area median income level commensurate with the income level.

(4) Owner or management agents shall discontinue use of the waiver as described in subdivision (a) in the event that more than 50 percent of the assisted units restricted to 30 percent area median income are occupied by households with adjusted incomes at move-in over 30 percent area
 median income.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 31, 2025, or the final expiration date of a waiver as described in subdivision (a), whichever is later, and, as of January 1 of the following year, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 491, Sec. 8.   (SB 1500)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative on or after July 31, 2025, by its own provisions.   Repealed January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.3. Supportive Housing for Veterans Funded by Tax Credits and Private Activity Bonds [987.300. - 987.300.]

987.300.

(a) If a qualified entity is unable to locate, match, or otherwise place a qualified tenant in a qualified unit within 28 days of the qualified unit becoming available, the qualified entity shall be eligible to match secondary tenants to the qualified units and the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee shall treat secondary tenants as eligible for the qualified unit.

(b) If, subsequent to the 14 days of the unit becoming available to secondary tenants, the qualified entity is unable to locate, match, or otherwise place either a qualified tenant or a secondary tenant in a qualified unit, the qualified entity shall be eligible to match a veteran experiencing homelessness with an income at or below 60 percent of
 area median income to the qualified unit and the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee shall treat the tenants as eligible for the qualified unit.

(c) If a qualified unit that is restricted to a qualified tenant with an extremely low income is occupied by a secondary tenant or other tenant who is a veteran experiencing homelessness with an income between 30 and 60 percent of area median income pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), that unit shall be redesignated to an area median income level commensurate with the income level of the secondary tenant and the secondary tenant shall pay rent commensurate with their household income’s percentage of the area median income.

(d) Beginning 12 months after a secondary tenant or other tenant who is a veteran experiencing homelessness has been placed pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b),
 if a qualified unit that is restricted to a qualified tenant with an extremely low income is occupied by a tenant with an income between 30 and 60 percent of area median income pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the next available comparable unit shall then be rented to a qualified tenant at 30 percent of the area median income with the goal of returning the project into compliance with the unit mix required by the project regulatory agreement.

(e) (1) The qualified entity tasked with making referrals to qualified units shall make a good faith effort to match a qualified tenant with an extremely low income, shall document these good faith efforts, and shall make this documentation available to the housing sponsor, who shall include the documentation in the tenant file, and, upon request, to the California Housing Finance Agency, the Department of Housing and Community Development, and the Department of Veterans Affairs.
 Documentation of these good faith efforts shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) Efforts to advertise to the community at least 90 days prior to the lease-up of the building.

(B) Efforts to work in partnership with local homeless services providers, including those that serve veterans experiencing homelessness.

(C) Efforts to coordinate with the local continuum of care to identify veterans experiencing homelessness with extremely low incomes.

(D) Efforts to coordinate with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to identify veterans experiencing homelessness with extremely low incomes.

(E) Documentation of contact with veterans experiencing homelessness with
 extremely low incomes and their case managers who were matched to the available unit and chose not to lease the unit.

(2) The California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee may adopt regulations to establish additional documentation standards for demonstrating a good faith effort.

(f) If a qualified entity has submitted a petition to the departments pursuant to Section 987.005 for a unit that is a qualified unit under both this section and Section 987.003, the outcome of the petition submitted pursuant to Section 987.005 shall determine whether the qualified entity is able to refer secondary tenants.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Extremely low income” has the same
 meaning as defined in Section 50106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Homeless” has the same meaning as defined in Section 578.3 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that section read on January 10, 2019.

(3) “Qualified entity” means an entity that is responsible for making referrals of qualified tenants to qualified units.

(4) “Qualified tenant” means an extremely low income veteran who is homeless.

(5) “Qualified unit” means a supportive housing unit restricted to extremely low income veterans pursuant to a regulatory agreement with the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee or with a bond issuer under the private activity bonds program administered by the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee.

(6) “Secondary tenants” means a veteran who is homeless and has an income of up to 60 percent of the area median income.

(7) “Supportive housing unit” has the same meaning as defined in Section 987.003.

(8) “Veteran” has the same meaning as defined in Section 987.003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 151.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Funds [988. - 988.7.]

988.

There is in the State Treasury a revolving fund known as the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943. All moneys deposited in such fund shall be subject to the provisions of this article. Money may be withdrawn from such fund in accordance with law upon requisition of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 328.)
-------------------------------------------

988.1.

The money paid by purchasers shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 and be available for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 1046.)
-------------------------------------------

988.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, “purchaser” has the same definition as provided in Section 987.53.

(b) Out of any money available in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, the department may advance to any purchaser upon their application, and under the policies as the department may, from time to time, prescribe, sums for the purpose of paying taxes and assessments, or making permanent improvements, including permanent improvements for the purpose of increasing farm productivity, or for keeping in good order or repair, or for painting, redecorating, or remodeling, all buildings, fences, or other permanent improvements on, or the
 insuring against fire or other hazards, any building, fence, or other permanent improvement, or crops on the property being purchased from the department, or the department may advance to the purchaser moneys actually expended in so doing.

(c) Any of the money advanced to a purchaser by the department may be added to the deferred principal of the purchaser’s account and shall bear interest at the rate prescribed by the department and shall be repaid by the purchaser to the department under the conditions as it may prescribe.

(d) The moneys advanced may, in the discretion of the department, be in addition to the maximum purchase price of a farm or home as provided by the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974, as amended, and acts supplementary thereto.

(e) Any money required by the department to be paid for the purpose of taxes, insurance premiums, and other charges when they become due may be maintained by the department using the escrow accounting method in accordance with lending industry standards and the laws governing escrow accounts of this type.

(f) The department shall be the sole judge of the need and desirability of making advances or requiring payments by the purchaser under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 81.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

988.3.

The Department of Finance may make advances of money to the department, needed to meet contingent expenses, of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), as the Department of Finance determines necessary, and may make advances of money to the department, needed to carry out Articles 3 (commencing with Section 984), 3.1 (commencing with Section 987.50), and 3.5 (commencing with Section 988) of this chapter of not more than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000), as the Department of Finance determines necessary, and these advances shall be administered as revolving funds. The Controller may draw warrants upon the
 Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund for these advances, and the Treasurer may pay them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 862, Sec. 3.   Effective September 13, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

988.4.

(a) For purposes of this section, “purchaser” includes any veteran whose only loan with the department is for the purpose of a home improvement on property that is the principal place of residence of the veteran.

(b) (1) Out of any money available in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, the department may advance to a purchaser upon their application, and under the policies as the department may, from time to time, prescribe, sums for the purpose of making alterations, repairs, or improvements on or in connection with the principal place of residence of the purchaser.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, in making the advances described in paragraph (1), the department may secure that advance by issuing a deed of trust, a promissory note, or other security interest that is subordinate to any existing financing on the principal place of residence of the purchaser.

(c) The department shall be the sole judge of the need and desirability of making advances and the method of repayment by the purchaser under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 82.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

988.5.

All loans granted under this article shall be funded in accordance with federal laws governing the use of tax-exempt bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 465, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

988.6.

(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving special fund known as the Veterans’ Bonds Payment Fund. All moneys in this fund shall be used solely to pay debt service, as this term is defined in subdivision (c) of Section 998.404, when due on bonds issued pursuant to all veterans’ farm and home purchase bond acts pursuant to this chapter, and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in this fund are continuously appropriated
 for this purpose.

(b) All moneys in the Veterans’ Bonds Payment Fund are necessary for immediate use and no amounts of this fund shall be considered “surplus money,” for the purposes of Section 16470 of the Government Code.

(c) Moneys in the Veterans’ Bonds Payment Fund shall be used solely as described in subdivision (a), and therefore no moneys in that fund shall be borrowed by, or transferred to, the General Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 16310 of the Government Code or any other similar authority, or to the General Cash Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16381 of the Government Code or any other similar authority.

(d) Moneys in the Veterans’ Bonds Payment Fund may be transferred to an account within the Refunding Escrow Fund created by Section 16784 of the Government Code for the purposes of paying
 debt service, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 998.404, in connection with the refunding of bonds issued pursuant to veterans’ farm and home purchase bond acts pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 27, Sec. 2.   (AB 2651)   Effective June 15, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

988.7.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, all moneys in the California National Guard Members’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1978 and any other account created in that fund, including, but not limited to, the National Guard Members’ Revenue Bond Revenue Account, that are not needed to meet revenue bond obligations shall be deposited into the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 within 30 days after the effective date of this section.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, on and after the effective date of this section, any revenues that would have otherwise been required to be deposited into the National Guard Members’ Revenue Bond Revenue Account pursuant to Section 485.1, the California National Guard Members’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1978, or any other account in that fund, shall be deposited into the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys deposited into the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 pursuant to subdivision (a) are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the department, and may be used by the department to make shared equity cooperative housing loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 377, Sec. 13.   (AB 1084)   Effective September 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.7. Pooled Self-Insurance  [989. - 989.1.]

989.

It is the intent of the Legislature to establish the Pooled Self-Insurance Fund in order to ensure that each of the department’s insurance reserve funds are self-sufficient and adequately maintained for the benefit of the contract purchasers. For reasons of prudent financial management, the department will pool the reserves for the purpose of providing reliable, consistent, and affordable home protection, and to encourage the strengthening of bond ratings, thereby increasing the efficacy of
 the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 502, Sec. 1.   (AB 1051)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

989.1.

(a) The department shall maintain a Pooled Self-Insurance Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. The Pooled Self-Insurance Fund includes the reserves and moneys held by the department, as authorized by Sections 987.25, 987.71, 987.74, 987.76, 987.88, and 989.4. The department may, in the discretion of the Secretary, pool these reserves for the purpose of providing reliable, consistent, and affordable home protection, and to encourage the strengthening
 of bond ratings.

(b) The department shall, consistent with the purposes of this article, prescribe and publish rules and regulations for the administration of the Pooled Self-Insurance Fund.

(c) The department may purchase insurance against any risk, or portion of any risk, otherwise payable out of appropriated moneys in the Pooled Self-Insurance Fund. The department shall make an annual report on or before September 1 of each year to the Legislature regarding any insurance coverage implemented or required by it. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the type of insurance coverage, its cost, loss-ratio information, the reason for purchasing the insurance, and any changes in existing insurance coverage and the reason for those changes.

(d) In each annual report to the Legislature regarding the status of the
 Pooled Self-Insurance Fund, all subfunds must show within three years of borrowing from the other subfunds that rates have effectively been adjusted to balance income to expenses, and that any internal borrowing between the various accounts and funds has been repaid in full. Each subfund must be self-sufficient within a period of time not to exceed three years of having borrowed from the other members of the Pooled Self-Insurance Fund. 

(e) Beginning six months after the inception of the Pooled Self-Insurance Fund, there will be a biennial audit of each subfund to ensure adequate rates are being charged to meet expenses. Premium rates of each subfund will be monitored and adjusted annually according to need to ensure self-sufficiency and reconcile internal borrowing between the members of the Pooled Self-Insurance Fund.

(f) Upon declaration of emergency by the Secretary, the
 Pooled Self-Insurance Fund may borrow from the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943. The borrowed funds are to be fully repaid from the Pooled Self-Insurance Fund within a period of time not to exceed three years.

(g) Upon dissolution or termination of any of the subaccounts or subfunds within the Pooled Self-Insurance Fund, whether established by statute or otherwise, any excess moneys shall revert to the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 502, Sec. 1.   (AB 1051)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.8. Disaster Indemnity [989.4. - 989.9.]

989.4.

The department shall maintain an Indemnity Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury, for the purpose of indemnifying eligible purchasers, for any of the following:

(a) The cost of repairing structural damage in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) caused by flood, including floods by
 surface water, waves, tidal water, tidal wave, overflow of streams or other bodies of water, spray from any of the foregoing, whether wind driven or not, and water that backs up through sewers or drains.

(b) The cost of repairing structural damage in excess of 5 percent of the total covered loss or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater, caused by earthquake, volcanic eruption, landslide, or mudslide.

(c) Money accruing to the Indemnity Fund is hereby appropriated for carrying out the purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Effective December 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

989.5.

All purchasers shall participate in the Indemnity Fund. Purchasers shall pay a reasonable charge, prescribed by the department, in addition to the regular monthly installment. Money so collected shall be deposited in the Indemnity Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 634, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

989.6.

The department shall, consistent with the purposes of this article, prescribe and publish rules and regulations for the administration of the Indemnity Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 362.)
-------------------------------------------

989.7.

The department may purchase insurance against any risk, or portion of any risk, otherwise payable out of appropriated moneys in the fund. The department shall make an annual report on or before September 1st of each year to the Legislature regarding any insurance coverage implemented or required by it. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the type of insurance coverage, its cost, the reason for purchasing the insurance, and any changes in existing insurance coverage and the reason for those changes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 209, Sec. 2.   Effective July 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

989.8.

Eligible purchasers shall be indemnified pursuant to this article solely from moneys in the Indemnity Fund, and the state shall not be liable beyond the assets of the Indemnity Fund for any obligation in connection therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 362.)
-------------------------------------------

989.9.

Nothing in this article shall impose any liability upon a purchaser electing to participate in the Indemnity Fund for any obligation imposed under this article, except for participation charges as provided in Section 989.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 362.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943 [991. - 991.]

991.

There is hereby established a Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943 composed of the Governor, Controller, Treasurer, Director of Finance, and Director of Veterans Affairs or their designated representatives, all of whom shall serve thereon without compensation and a majority of whom shall be empowered to act for the committee. The Attorney General shall be the legal advisor of the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943.

Upon request of the Department of Veterans Affairs, supported by a statement of the plans and
 projects of the Department of Veterans Affairs with respect thereto, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943 shall determine whether or not a bond issue under this article is necessary or desirable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 161, Sec. 1.5.   Effective July 12, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5d. Veterans Affairs Construction Act [996.13. - 996.21.]

996.13.

This article may be cited as the Veterans Affairs Construction Act of 1953.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1902.)
-------------------------------------------

996.14.

With the approval of the Department of Finance and the California Veterans Board, the Public Works Board, pursuant to the provisions of the Property Acquisition Act, may acquire real property, and, after approval of preliminary plans under the procedure provided by Section 6 of the Budget Act of 1953, the department may construct and equip a building thereon, primarily for the department’s own use and make improvements to such property, building, and equipment, not to exceed in total two million six hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,650,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1727.)
-------------------------------------------

996.17.

The Department of Veterans Affairs shall have a prior claim on any office space constructed pursuant to this article at the time of initial occupancy of the office space and at all times thereafter; provided, the department shall pay rentals as prescribed in Section 996.19 for the space it occupies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1413.)
-------------------------------------------

996.18.

The Department of Veterans Affairs shall contract with the Department of General Services for the maintenance and repair of all public works constructed, acquired, or operated under the provisions of this act, such maintenance and repair to include the items of maintenance and repair customarily supplied and afforded to state buildings by the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

996.19.

The buildings or improvements provided under the provisions of this article may contain space in excess of the requirements of the Department of Veterans Affairs, and until needed, may be leased or let at such rental and upon such terms and conditions as may be approved by the Department of Veterans Affairs; provided, that rentals charged shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1902.)
-------------------------------------------

996.21.

When money from the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 or the Veterans Affairs Construction Fund is used for investment purposes in the purchase of property and in the construction of buildings, and appurtenant facilities or in the purchase of property, or in the construction of buildings, and appurtenant facilities for the use of the Department of Veterans Affairs, or for the use of the Department of Veterans Affairs and other state agencies, the Director of Veterans Affairs may do any and all things necessary to protect the investment including purchasing insurance against the loss of or damage to the property or the loss of use and occupancy of the property.
 Any transaction entered into by the Director of Veterans Affairs under this section shall be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5j. Veterans Bond Act of 1968 [996.971. - 996.981.]

996.971.

This article may be cited as the Veterans Bond Act of 1968.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1572.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 4, 1968, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.972.

The State General Obligation Bond Law, except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to “herein” shall be deemed to refer both to this article and such law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1572.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 4, 1968, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.973.

As used in this article and for the purposes of this article as used in the State General Obligation Bond Law, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720), Part 3, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Bond” means veterans bond, a state general obligation bond issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(c) “Board” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(d) “Fund” means the Veterans Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 created by Section 988 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(e) “Bond Act” means this article authorizing the issuance of State General Obligation Bonds and adopting Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720), Part 3, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code by reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1572.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 4, 1968, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.974.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the provisions of the Veterans Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1943 and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991, shall be and it hereby is authorized and empowered to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000), in the manner provided herein, but not otherwise, nor
 in excess thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1572.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 4, 1968, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.975.

All bonds herein authorized, which shall have been duly sold and delivered as herein provided, shall constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected such a sum, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, as
 shall be required to pay the principal and interest on said bonds as herein provided, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collections of said revenue, to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect such additional sum.
